Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 2

Employee Compensation and Indemnification

7-51-201. Law enforcement officers and firefighters — Compensation for injury or death — Certain disabilities presumed to have been suffered in course of employment.

Whenever the state of Tennessee, or any municipal corporation or other political subdivision of the state that maintains a regular law enforcement department manned by regular and full-time employees and has established or hereafter establishes any form of compensation to be paid to such law enforcement officers for any condition or impairment of health that results in loss of life or personal injury in the line of duty or course of employment, there shall be and there is hereby established a presumption that any impairment of health of such law enforcement officers caused by hypertension or heart disease resulting in hospitalization, medical treatment or any disability, shall be presumed, unless the contrary be shown by competent medical evidence, to have occurred or to be due to accidental injury suffered in the course of employment. Any such condition or impairment of health that results in death shall be presumed, unless the contrary be shown by competent medical evidence, to be a loss of life in line of duty, and to have been in the line and course of employment, and in the actual discharge of the duties of such officer's position, or the sustaining of personal injuries by external and violent means or by accident in the course of employment and in line of duty. Such law enforcement officer shall have successfully passed a physical examination prior to such claimed disability, or upon entering governmental employment and such examination fails to reveal any evidence of the condition of hypertension or heart disease.

For purposes of this subsection (a), “law enforcement officer” includes correctional security job classification employees of the departments of correction and children's services, and full-time county law enforcement officers, including county deputy sheriffs employed in correctional security positions. If such inclusion of full-time county law enforcement officers, including county deputy sheriffs employed in correctional security positions, in the definition of “law enforcement officer” mandates increased liability to a county under the Tennessee consolidated retirement system, or a local retirement system, then such full-time county law enforcement officers, including county deputy sheriffs employed in correctional security positions in such county, shall not be included in such definition for purposes of the Tennessee consolidated retirement system or a local retirement system unless the county legislative body of such county advises the retirement division of its desire to apply such definition to such personnel.

Whenever the state of Tennessee, or any municipal corporation or other political subdivision of the state maintains a regular fire department manned by regular and full-time employees and has established or hereafter establishes any form of compensation, other than workers' compensation, to be paid to such firefighters for any condition or impairment of health that results in loss of life or personal injury in the line of duty or course of employment, there shall be and there is hereby established a presumption that any impairment of health of such firefighters caused by disease of the lungs, hypertension or heart disease resulting in hospitalization, medical treatment or any disability, shall be presumed, unless the contrary is shown by competent medical evidence, to have occurred or to be due to accidental injury suffered in the course of employment. Any such condition or impairment of health which results in death shall be presumed, unless the contrary is shown by competent medical evidence, to be a loss of life in line of duty, and to have been in the line and course of employment, and in the actual discharge of the duties of such firefighter's position, or the sustaining of personal injuries by external and violent means or by accident in the course of employment and in the line of duty. Such firefighter shall have successfully passed a physical examination prior to such claimed disability, or upon entering upon governmental employment, and such examination fails to reveal any evidence of the condition or disease of the lungs, hypertension or heart disease.

It is hereby declared to be the legislative intent that this section is to be remedial in character and to permit and require any municipal corporation maintaining any permanent fire department to be covered by its provisions.

Whenever any county having a population greater than four hundred thousand (400,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, or any municipal corporation within such county, maintains within its fire department, and has established or hereafter establishes any form of compensation, other than workers' compensation, to be paid to a person employed by such division as an emergency medical technician or emergency medical technician advanced or paramedic, for any condition or impairment of health that shall result in loss of life or personal injury in the line of duty or course of employment, there shall be and there is hereby established a presumption that any impairment of health of such person caused by hypertension or heart disease resulting in hospitalization, medical treatment or any disability shall be presumed, unless the contrary is shown by competent medical evidence, to have occurred or to be due to accidental injury suffered in the course of employment. Any such condition or impairment of health which results in death shall be presumed, unless the contrary is shown by competent medical evidence, to be a loss of life in line of duty, and to have been in the line and course of employment, and in the actual discharge of the duties of the position, or the sustaining of personal injuries by external and violent means or by accident in the course of employment and in the line of duty. Such person shall have successfully passed a physical examination prior to such claimed disability, or upon entering governmental employment, and such examination fails to reveal any evidence of the condition of hypertension or heart disease.

It is hereby declared to be the legislative intent that this section is to be remedial in character and to permit and require any such municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state maintaining such division to be covered by its provisions.

Whenever this state, any municipal corporation, or other political subdivision of the state that maintains a fire department has established or establishes any form of compensation to be paid to firefighters for any condition or impairment of health that results in loss of life or personal injury in the line of duty or course of employment, there is a presumption that any condition or impairment of health of firefighters caused by all forms of Non-Hodgkin's Lymphoma cancer, colon cancer, skin cancer, or multiple myeloma cancer resulting in hospitalization, medical treatment, or any disability, has arisen out of employment, unless the contrary is shown by competent medical evidence. Any such condition or impairment of health that results in death is presumed to be a loss of life in the line of duty, to have arisen out of employment, and to have been in the actual discharge of the duties of the firefighter's position, unless the contrary is shown by a physician board certified in oncology. Secondary employment or lifestyle habits may be considered when determining whether the presumption established in this subsection (d) applies.

Any firefighter desiring to utilize the presumption established in this subsection (d), must obtain a physical medical examination after July 1, 2019, and the examination must include a cancer screening that fails to reveal any evidence of the cancers listed in this subsection (d).

In order to be eligible to utilize the presumption established in this subsection (d), a firefighter shall obtain annual physical medical examinations that include cancer screenings for the specific types of cancer listed in this subsection (d).

Any physical medical examination required by this subsection (d) shall be paid by the employer's health benefits plan at no cost to the employee.

In order to be eligible to utilize the presumption established in this subsection (d), a firefighter must have been exposed to heat, smoke, and fumes, or carcinogenic, poisonous, toxic, or chemical substances, while performing the duties of a firefighter in the firefighter's capacity as an employee and must have completed five (5) or more consecutive years in service with an eligible fire department. A firefighter may utilize the presumption established in this subsection (d) for up to five (5) years after the firefighter's most recent date of exposure as contemplated herein.

As used in this subsection (d):

“Fire department” means a department recognized by the state fire marshal's office pursuant to the Fire Department Recognition Act, compiled in title 68, chapter 102, part 3, and manned by full-time, paid employees; and

“Firefighter” means any full-time, paid employee of a fire department of the state or a political subdivision of the state.

This subsection (d) does not affect a person's rights under § 7-51-205 and does not limit any benefit in effect in the state.

Acts 1965, ch. 299, § 1; 1970, ch. 593, § 1; modified; T.C.A., § 6-639; Acts 1982, ch. 599, § 1; 1985, ch. 345, § 1; 1985 (1st E.S.), ch. 5, § 18; 1986, ch. 590, § 1; 1989, ch. 278, § 25; 1996, ch. 1079, § 26; 2015, ch. 313, § 1; 2019, ch. 490, § 2; 2020, ch. 754, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2019, ch. 490, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Barry Brady Act.”

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted “within four (4) months of March 24, 1986.” at the end of (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment added (d).

The 2020 amendment rewrote (d)(2)(A), which read: “Any firefighter employed by a fire department before July 1, 2019, and desiring to utilize the presumption established in this subsection (d), must obtain a physical medical examination before July 1, 2020, and the examination must include a cancer screening that fails to reveal any evidence of the cancers listed in this subsection (d). Any firefighter employed by a fire department on or after July 1, 2019, and desiring to utilize the presumption established in this subsection (d) must successfully pass a pre-employment physical medical examination, and the examination must include a cancer screening that fails to reveal any evidence of the cancers listed in this subsection (d).”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 313, § 2. April 28, 2015.

Acts 2019, ch. 490, § 3. July 1, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 754, § 2. June 22, 2020.

Cross-References. Accidental disability retirement allowances, §8-36-502.

Retirement benefits upon death in line of duty, §8-36-108.

7-51-202. Compensation for death of correctional employee or community services employee killed in the line of duty.

For the purposes of this section, “in the line of duty” means in the course of employment and in the actual discharge of the duties of the position.

The estate of any correctional employee or community services employee of the state who is killed in the line of duty shall be entitled to receive the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). Payment shall be made from the general fund after receipt by the department of finance and administration of a certified death certificate and an affidavit from the decedent's employer that the decedent was killed in the line of duty.

Acts 2014, ch. 1003, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2014, ch. 1003, § 1 purported to enact this section as §7-51-210. It has been designated as §7-51-202 by authority of the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Former §7-51-202 (Acts 1967, ch. 374, § 1; 1972, ch. 782, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 6-640), concerning state employees sued for damages in the course of their employment, defense counsel, indemnification, exceptions, and limits of liability, was repealed by Acts 1987, ch. 405, § 3.

7-51-203. Liability insurance for employee protection.

All municipal corporations or other political subdivisions of the state of Tennessee are hereby authorized to contract at governmental expense for policies of liability insurance to protect employees in the course of their employment.

Acts 1967, ch. 374, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-641.

7-51-204. Fire department employee association dues.

Any municipal corporation or other political subdivision of the state that maintains a regular fire department with regular full-time employees shall, upon the written request of any such employee, make monthly deductions of membership dues for an employee association if the chief administrative officer of the employee association has previously certified to the chief executive officer of the municipality or political subdivision that the association's current membership is not less than forty percent (40%) of all the employees of the municipality or political subdivision who qualify for membership.

Such deductions shall be made by the municipality or other political subdivision from each regular paycheck and shall be remitted to the employee association within thirty (30) days after the deduction is made.

Authorization for such payroll deduction shall continue in effect until the next regular pay period following the thirtieth day after receipt by the municipality or other political subdivision of a written revocation signed by the employee.

If any provision of this section or the application of this section to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the section that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end the provisions of this section are declared to be severable.

Acts 1987, ch. 223, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 130, § 1; 2001, ch. 411, § 1.

7-51-205. Firefighters — Disease, cancer or death — Presumptions.

For the purposes of this section, “firefighter” means any regular and full-time employee of a county with a metropolitan government with a population of four hundred thousand (400,000) or more, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, who is required to extinguish and control fires or fire-related incidents and other employees of fire departments who are required to perform their duties under and in a toxic environment.

Any county with a metropolitan form of government with a population of four hundred thousand (400,000) or more, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, that maintains a regular fire department manned by regular and full-time employees, and has established or hereafter establishes any form of compensation, other than workers' compensation, to be paid to such firefighters for any condition or impairment of health that results in loss to life or personal injury in the line of duty or course of employment, may establish by ordinance a presumption that any impairment of health of such firefighter caused by disease or cancer resulting in hospitalization, medical treatment or any disability, shall be presumed, unless the contrary is shown by competent medical evidence, to have occurred or to be due to accidental injury suffered in the course of employment. Any such condition or impairment of health that results in death shall be presumed, unless the contrary is shown by competent medical evidence, to be a loss of life in the line of duty, and to have been in the line and course of employment, and in the actual discharge of the duties of such firefighter's position, or the sustaining of personal injuries by external and violent means or by accident in the course of employment and in the line of duty; provided, that such firefighter shall have successfully passed a physical examination prior to such claimed disability, or upon entering upon such firefighter's metropolitan government employment, and such examination fails to reveal any evidence of the condition of cancer.

Acts 1991, ch. 465, §§ 2, 3.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

7-51-206. [Repealed.]

Acts 2004, ch. 878, § 1; 2005, ch. 314, § 1; 2006, ch. 912, § 1; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 445, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former section 7-51-206 concerned compensation for death of firefighter killed in the line of duty.

7-51-207. [Repealed.]

Acts 2005, ch. 450, § 1; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 445, § 3, effective July 1, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former section 7-51-207 concerned compensation for death of volunteer rescue squad worker killed in the line of duty.

7-51-208. [Repealed.]

Acts 2006, ch. 912, § 2; 2012, ch. 532, § 1; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 445, § 4, effective July 1, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former section 7-51-208 concerned compensation for death of law enforcement officer killed in the line of duty.

7-51-209. Presumptive disability in acquiring infectious diseases in the line of duty by emergency rescue workers.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Body fluids” means blood and body fluids containing visible blood and other fluids to which universal precautions for prevention of occupational transmission of blood-borne pathogens, as established by the centers for disease control and prevention, apply;

For purposes of potential transmission of human immunodeficiency virus and hepatitis C virus, “body fluids” includes salivary and sinus fluids, including droplets, sputum, and saliva, mucous and other fluids through which human immunodeficiency virus and hepatitis C virus can be transmitted between persons;

“Emergency rescue worker” means any person employed full-time by the state or any political subdivision of the state, including any county having a metropolitan form of government as a firefighter, paramedic, emergency medical technician or emergency medical technician advanced;

“Emergency rescue worker” does not include any person employed by a public hospital or any person employed by a subsidiary thereof;

“High risk of occupational exposure” means risk that is incurred because an emergency rescue worker, in performing the basic duties associated with such worker's employment:

Provides emergency medical treatment in a non-healthcare setting where there is a potential for transfer of body fluids between persons; or

At the site of an accident, fire or other rescue or public safety operation, or in an emergency rescue or public safety vehicle, handles body fluids in or out of containers or works with or otherwise handles needles or other sharp instruments exposed to body fluids;

“Infectious disease” means human immunodeficiency virus and hepatitis C virus; and

“Occupational exposure” in the case of infectious diseases, means an exposure that occurs during the performance of job duties that may place a worker at risk of infection.

The general assembly finds that an emergency rescue worker, in the course of employment, runs a high risk of occupational exposure to infectious disease.

For reasons stated in subdivision (b)(1), any emergency rescue worker who suffers a condition or impairment of health that is caused by human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C virus, and that results in total or partial disability or death shall be presumed to have a disability suffered in the line of duty, unless the contrary is shown by a preponderance of the evidence. However, in order to be entitled to the presumption, the emergency rescue worker must verify by written declaration that, to the best of the emergency rescue worker's knowledge and belief: In case of a medical condition caused by or derived from human immunodeficiency virus or hepatitis C virus, the emergency rescue worker has not:

Been exposed outside the scope of the worker's employment, through transfer of bodily fluids, to any person known to have any sickness or medical condition derived from an infectious disease;

Had a transfusion of blood or blood components, other than a transfusion arising out of an accident or injury happening in connection with the worker's present employment, or received any blood products for the treatment of a coagulation disorder since last undergoing medical tests for infectious disease, which tests failed to indicate the presence of any infectious disease;

Engaged in unsafe sexual practices or other high-risk behavior, as identified by the centers for disease control and prevention or the surgeon general of the United States, or had sexual relations with a person known to the worker to have engaged in such unsafe sexual practices or other high-risk behavior; or

Used intravenous drugs not prescribed by a physician.

Whenever any standard, medically-recognized vaccine or other form of immunization exists for the prevention of an infectious disease for which a presumption is granted under this section, if medically indicated in the given circumstances pursuant to immunization policies established by the advisory committee on immunization practices of the United States public health service, an emergency rescue worker may be required by such worker's employer to undergo the immunization, unless the worker's physician determines in writing that the immunization or other prophylaxis would pose a significant risk to the worker's health. Absent such written declaration, failure or refusal by an emergency rescue worker to undergo such immunization disqualifies the worker from the benefits of the presumption established by this section.

This section does not apply to benefits payable under or granted in a noncompulsory policy of life insurance or disability insurance, unless the insurer and insured have negotiated for such additional benefits to be included in the policy contract. However, the state or any political subdivision of the state, including any county having a metropolitan form of government, may negotiate a policy contract for life and disability insurance that includes accidental death benefits or double indemnity coverage for any condition or impairment of health suffered by an emergency rescue worker, which condition or impairment is caused by an infectious disease and results in total or partial disability or death.

An emergency rescue worker shall file an incident or accident report with the emergency rescue worker's employer of each instance of known or suspected occupational exposure to infectious disease as such is defined in subdivision (a)(4). The employer shall maintain a record of the incident or accident report so filed. Such report must be filed by the employee within seven (7) days of the incident or accident occurring.

In order to be entitled to the presumption established by this section, an emergency rescue worker must, prior to diagnosis, have undergone standard, medically-acceptable tests for evidence of the infectious disease for which the presumption is sought, or evidence of medical conditions derived therefrom, which tests fail to indicate the presence of infection.

On or after July 1, 2012, an emergency rescue worker may be required to undergo a preemployment physical examination that tests for any evidence of human immunodeficiency virus. In order to be entitled to the presumption established by this section, the test shall be negative for evidence of human immunodeficiency virus.

On or after July 1, 2015, an emergency rescue worker may be required to undergo a preemployment physical examination that tests for any evidence of infectious disease. In order to be entitled to the presumption established by this section, the test shall be negative for evidence of infectious disease.

This section does not apply to the Tennessee consolidated retirement system.

This section shall apply to any emergency rescue worker following termination of service for a period of one (1) year commencing with the last actual date of service.

This section shall not apply to cases involving a death of an emergency rescue worker in the line of duty.

The presumption established in this section shall not apply to the state death benefit.

This section shall not apply to full-time or part-time instructors of the department of commerce and insurance.

Acts 2012, ch. 958, §§ 2, 3; 2015, ch. 289, §§ 1-4.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment in (a)(1)(B), added “and hepatitis C virus” following “human immunodeficiency virus” twice; in (a)(4), added “and hepatitis C virus” following “human immunodeficiency virus”; in (b)(2), added “or hepatitis C virus” following “human immunodeficiency virus” twice; and rewrote (f)(2), which read: “On or after July 1, 2012, an emergency rescue worker may be required to undergo a pre-employment physical examination that tests for any evidence of infectious disease. In order to be entitled to the presumption established by this section, the test shall be negative for evidence of infectious diseases.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 289, § 5. July 1, 2015.

7-51-210. Compensation for death of emergency responder in line of duty.

For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Emergency medical technician” means an emergency medical technician advanced and paramedic;

“Emergency responder” means a firefighter, emergency medical technician, a volunteer rescue squad worker, or law enforcement officer;

“Firefighter” means any regular or full-time employee of a fire department as defined in § 68-102-302, or any unpaid volunteer member of a municipal or nonprofit fire department who is registered and recognized by the state fire marshal and who is required to extinguish and control fires or fire-related incidents;

“In the line of duty” means in the course of employment and in the actual discharge of the duties of the position;

“Law enforcement officer” means the sheriff, sheriff's deputies, or any police officer employed, commissioned, or appointed by this state, a municipality, or political subdivision of this state whose primary responsibility is the prevention and detection of crime and the apprehension of offenders; and

“Volunteer rescue squad worker” means any person who is trained in emergency and rescue work and who performs such work without compensation in a unit that is equipped to address such situations.

The estate of any emergency responder who is killed in the line of duty shall be entitled to receive a two-hundred-fifty-thousand-dollar annuity, with the estate receiving an annual installment of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for five (5) years. The emergency responder must have been current in any required training and physical exams at the time the death occurred for the estate to receive the payment. Payment shall be made from the general fund after receipt by the department of finance and administration of a certified death certificate, letters testamentary or letters of administration for the estate of the deceased from a probate court, and an affidavit from the decedent's employer or volunteer unit that the decedent was killed in the line of duty.

A claim for payment of an annuity pursuant to this section must be filed with the department of finance and administration no later than three (3) years after the date of death of the decedent.

A person's estate is only entitled to receive one (1) two-hundred-fifty-thousand-dollar annuity, regardless of the person being in more than one (1) category of emergency responder.

A denial of a claim made under this section by the estate of a law enforcement officer shall be subject to review by the Tennessee peace officer standards and training commission within ninety (90) days of the denial. The commission has the authority to review the claim and issue a final order which is binding upon this state. The commission shall cause copies of the final order to be delivered to the claimant's estate and the department of finance and administration.

Acts 2017, ch. 445, § 1; 2019, ch. 395, §§ 1, 2; 2020, ch. 776, §§ 1, 2.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “employed, commissioned, or appointed by this state” for “employed by this state” following “or any police officer” in (a)(4); and added (e).

The 2020 amendment inserted “emergency medical technician,” in the definition of “Emergency responder” and added the definition of “Emergency medical technician”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 445, § 5. July 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, ch. 395, § 3. May 10, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 776, § 5. July 15, 2020.